District of Columbia statutes.
7-2502.09

Revocation of registration certificate.

(a)

A registration certificate shall be revoked if:

(1)

Any of the criteria in § 7-2502.03(a) are not currently met;

(2)

The registered firearm has become an unregisterable firearm under the terms of § 7-2502.02, or a destructive device; or

(3)

The information furnished to the Chief on the application for a registration certificate proves to be intentionally false.

(4)

Repealed.

(b)

Repealed.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title II, § 209, 23 DCR 2464
Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-372, § 3(h), 56 DCR 1365
June 3, 2011, D.C. Law 18-377,§ 2(d), 58 DCR 1174

History

Applicability to private operator, see § 24-261.02a.

Cross References

This section is referenced in § 2-1831.03 and § 24-261.02a.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 6-2319.
1973 Ed., § 6-1819.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 17-372 designated subsec. (a); in subsec. (a), inserted “or” at the end of par. (2), substituted a period for “; and” at the end of par. (3), and repealed par. (4); and added subsec. (b). Prior to repeal, par. (4) of subsec. (a) read as follows: “(4) There is a violation or omission of the duties, obligations or requirements imposed by § 7-2502.08.”
D.C. Law 18-377, in subsec. (a)(1), substituted “§ 7-2502.03(a)” for “§ 7-2502.03”; and rewrote subsec. (b).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(h) of Firearms Registration Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-651, January 6, 2009, 56 DCR 911).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 502(d) of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-693, January 18, 2011, 58 DCR 640).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 502(d) of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-45, April 20, 2011, 58 DCR 3701).

Emergency Legislation